testdata/strange.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet/>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="ppres" /> 
		<sdef n="pprs" /> 
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="num" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>

<pardef n="literox">
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="literox">
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="litero">
  <e>       <i><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></i></e>
</pardef>

   <pardef n="generic__vblex">
<e>       <p><l><s n="vblex"/></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">

<e>       <i>a</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e>       <i>b</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e>       <i>c</i><par n="litero"/></e><e><i>d</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e>       <i>e</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e>       <i>a</i><par n="litero"/></e>
<e>       <i>x</i><par n="literox"/></e>
<e>       <i>g</i><par n="generic__vblex"/></e>
	</section>
</dictionary>
